Utah statutes.
76-9-402.   Privacy violation.
(1) A person is guilty of privacy violation if, except as authorized by law,
he:
(a)  Trespasses on property with intent to subject anyone to eavesdropping or
other surveillance in a private place; or
(b)  Installs in any private place, without the consent of the person or
persons entitled to privacy there, any device for observing, photographing,
recording, amplifying, or broadcasting sounds or events in the place or uses
any such unauthorized installation; or
(c)  Installs or uses outside of a private place any device for hearing,
recording, amplifying, or broadcasting sounds originating in the place which
would not ordinarily be audible or comprehensible outside, without the consent
of the person or persons entitled to privacy there.
(2)  Privacy violation is a class B misdemeanor.
